Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-401
Board of Educational Lands and Funds; records of state lands; duty to keep.

The records appertaining to all public lands of the state shall be kept in the office of the Board of Educational Lands and Funds at the seat of government.

Laws 1877, § 4, p. 173;

R.S.1913, § 5559;

C.S.1922, § 4863;

C.S.1929, § 84-402;

R.S.1943, § 84-401.

Conveyances of real estate, custody after recording, see section 72-108.